Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.100

Disclosure information.

A person licensed under this chapter must provide clients at the commencement of any program of treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning the practice, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients to choose the provider and treatment modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter. The disclosure information must also include the license holder's professional education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of treatment where known, financial requirements, and such other information as required by rule. The disclosure must be acknowledged in writing by the client and license holder.

[ 2001 c 251 s 10.]